District of Columbia statutes.
15-715

Witness fees in prosecutions for cruelty to children or animals.

An officer or member of the Humane Society is not entitled to any fee as a witness in the prosecution of a case of cruelty to children or animals.

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 536, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
1981 Ed., § 15-715.
1973 Ed., § 15-715.